Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB362.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 481(c) and (d), (D) AND (F) of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 481. False Statements; Investigations; Penalty.--* * *(a.1) Any person who knowingly and with intent to defraud produces, uses or traffics in, has control or custody of or possesses one or more counterfeit access devices that replicates the payment card information of a person receiving assistance, commits a crime which shall be graded as provided in subsection <--<--123456789101112131415161718 (b.1).(A.1) A PERSON COMMITS AN OFFENSE IF THE PERSON KNOWINGLY AND WITH INTENT TO DEFRAUD:(1) POSSESSES, USES OR ATTEMPTS TO USE A SCANNING DEVICE TO ACCESS, READ, OBTAIN, MEMORIZE OR STORE, TEMPORARILY OR PERMANENTLY, A RECIPIENT'S ACCESS DEVICE INFORMATION.(2) POSSESSES, USES OR ATTEMPTS TO USE A REENCODER TO REPLICATE A RECIPIENT'S ACCESS DEVICE INFORMATION ON ONE OR MORE ACCESS DEVICES OR ON ANY OTHER MEDIUM THAT ALLOWS THE USE OF A RECIPIENT'S ACCESS DEVICE INFORMATION.(3) POSSESSES, USES OR ATTEMPTS TO USE ONE OR MORE ACCESS DEVICES OR INFORMATION FROM ONE OR MORE ACCESS DEVICES THAT REPLICATE A RECIPIENT'S ACCESS DEVICE INFORMATION.* * *(b.1) Any person violating subsection (a.1) commits the grade of crime determined from the following schedule:Amount of Assistance or Food Stamps Degree of Crime$1,000 or more Felony of the second degree$999 and under, or an attempt to commit any act prohibited in subsection (a.1) Felony of the third degree(B.1) (1) A FIRST OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A.1) CONSTITUTES A FELONY OF THE THIRD DEGREE.(2) A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A.1) CONSTITUTES A FELONY OF THE SECOND DEGREE.(B.2) FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, IN DETERMINING WHETHER AN OFFENSE IS A FIRST, SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, THE COURT SHALL INCLUDE A CONVICTION, ACCEPTANCE OF ACCELERATED 20250SB0362PN1800 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REHABILITATIVE DISPOSITION OR OTHER FORM OF PRELIMINARY DISPOSITION, OCCURRING BEFORE THE SENTENCING ON THE PRESENT VIOLATION, FOR AN OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION, AN OFFENSE SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO AN OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION OR UNDER THE PRIOR LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH OR A SIMILAR OFFENSE UNDER THE STATUTES OF ANY OTHER STATE OR OF THE UNITED STATES.(c) Any person committing a crime enumerated in subsection (a) or (a.1) shall be ordered to pay restitution of any moneys received by reason of any false statement, misrepresentation, impersonation, failure to disclose required information or fraudulent means. Restitution ordered under this subsection may be paid in a lump sum, by monthly installments or according to such other schedule as is deemed just by the sentencing court. Notwithstanding the provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. § 1106(c)(2) (relating to restitution for injuries to person or property) to the contrary, the period of time during which the offender is ordered to make restitution may exceed the maximum term of imprisonment to which the offender could have been sentenced for the crime of which that person was convicted, if the sentencing court determines such period to be reasonable and in the interests of justice.(d) There shall be a [four-year] FIVE-YEAR statute of limitations on all crimes enumerated in [subsection] subsections (a) and (a.1).* * * (f.1) An individual convicted of any offense under subsection (a.1) shall be ineligible to receive cash assistance permanently from the date of a conviction.(F) AN APPLICANT FOR OR RECIPIENT OF [AID TO FAMILIES WITH DEPENDENT CHILDREN OR GENERAL ASSISTANCE] TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE 20250SB0362PN1800 - 3 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR NEEDY FAMILIES CONVICTED OF ANY OFFENSE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (A) OR (A.1) SHALL BE INELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE CASH ASSISTANCE FOR A PERIOD OF SIX MONTHS FROM THE DATE OF A FIRST CONVICTION, FOR A PERIOD OF TWELVE MONTHS FROM THE DATE OF A SECOND CONVICTION AND PERMANENTLY FROM THE DATE OF A THIRD CONVICTION.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0362PN1800 - 4 - 1234567